Florida, session 2026, HB6523.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
92
93 Section 1. The facts stated in the preamble to this act
94 are found and declared to be true.
95 Section 2. A sum as specified in the General
96 Appropriations Act is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund
97 to the Department of State for the relief of the descendants of
98 Charles Greenlee, Walter Irvin, Samuel Shepherd, and Ernest
99 Thomas.
100 Section 3. A person compensated under this act is
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6523-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S

HB 6523 2026
101 ineligible for any further compensation related to the factual
102 situation described in this act.
103 Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6523-00